California statutes. Water Code
-------------------------------------------

26604.6.

The board of supervisors may require in the contract that upon the effective date of the contract, the district officers shall continue to perform all the duties relative to the collection of district assessments, including delinquent assessments, levied prior to the effective date of the contract, the enforcement of their payment, and the sale of property for nonpayment and redemption from sale pursuant to the laws in force in the district at such effective date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 955.)
-------------------------------------------

26605.

Upon termination of the contract, the board of directors of the district shall appoint an assessor, or both an assessor and collector, who shall serve until the election of their successor at the next general district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1938.)
-------------------------------------------

26606.

After termination of the contract, the county officers shall continue with the collection of district assessments on the county rolls and with the redemption or deeding of property subject to delinquent district assessments on county rolls until all such assessments have been collected or all such property has been either redeemed or tax-defaulted for unpaid assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1420, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Assessment and Equalization [26625. - 26631.]

26625.

The applicable part of the county assessment rolls as made by the county assessor and equalized or corrected by the board of supervisors or the State Board of Equalization shall be the basis for levying the district’s assessments; provided, that in any case where the board of directors of a district has, prior to November 8, 1967, adopted a formal resolution or entered into a written agreement with an owner of land within the district providing a different basis for levying the district’s assessments against the land of such owner, such resolution or agreement shall be the basis for levying the district’s assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

26625.1.

If in the Madera Irrigation District, the county assessment roll reflects assessed value based on the California Land Conservation Act of 1965 (Williamson Act), (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code) for any parcel, then, upon the request of the Madera Irrigation District, such parcel shall also be assessed by the county assessor pursuant to Section 401 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The assessed value for such parcel thus determined shall be entered on a supplemental assessment roll for district assessment purposes only and shall be used by the assessor for district assessments. The Madera Irrigation
 District shall reimburse the county for any increased cost incurred in making such additional assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 944.)
-------------------------------------------

26626.

On or before the first Monday of March of each year, the board of directors of the district shall cause to be filed with the county auditor a description of the exterior boundaries of any portion of the district in which a rate of assessment is to be levied which is different from the rate to be levied in any other portion of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1938.)
-------------------------------------------

26627.

Annually, on or before the third Monday in August, the county auditor shall transmit to the directors of the district a written statement showing separately the total value of all lands within the district subject to assessment and the total value of all such lands in any portion of the district within which a different rate of assessment is to be levied. The values so reported shall be those obtained from the assessment books of the county as last equalized and corrected together with an estimate of the values of the lands within the district subject to assessment by the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1938.)
-------------------------------------------

26628.

Where the district has not elected to transfer the duties of collector to the county tax collector, the county assessor shall furnish the district a duplicate of the applicable portions of the county’s assessment rolls at the time of transmittal of the statement of values required by Section 26627 and, upon receipt, a duplicate statement of the assessed values of all lands within the district subject to assessment by the State Board of Equalization. The rolls and statement so delivered shall for all purposes become the assessment rolls of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1938.)
-------------------------------------------

26629.

Within 15 days after receipt of the statement of values and duplicate rolls, the district’s board of directors shall levy an annual assessment upon the land within the district in the same manner as provided in Chapters 2 and 3 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1938.)
-------------------------------------------

26630.

Where the district has not elected to transfer the duties of collector to the county tax collector, the secretary shall compute and enter in a separate column of the assessment roll the respective sums to be paid as an annual district assessment on the land listed and deliver the completed assessment roll to the collector before the first day of November.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1938.)
-------------------------------------------

26631.

Upon receiving the roll from the secretary, the collector shall proceed with the collection of the assessment in accordance with the provisions of Chapters 4, 5, and 6 of this part, and such provisions shall apply to all proceedings for the enforcement of the collection of the assessment or the sale of the property as when property is assessed as provided in Chapters 2 and 3 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1938.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Collection [26650. - 26658.]

26650.

Where the district has elected to transfer the duties of collector to the county tax collector, the delivery of duplicate assessment rolls shall not be required, but the county auditor shall furnish to the directors the statement of assessed values as provided in Section 26627.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1480.)
-------------------------------------------

26651.

Annually before September 1st, the district’s directors shall levy an annual assessment upon the lands within the district for all district purposes in the manner provided in Chapter 2 of this part, and fix the rate of assessment as provided in Chapter 3, and shall thereupon transmit to the county auditor a statement of the rates fixed. The rate shall be sufficient to recover the expense of collection in addition to other amounts required by law. If different portions of the district require different rates of assessment the statement shall include the applicable rates for such portions. The rate shall be designated in the number of cents upon each one hundred dollars
 ($100), using as a basis the value of the land as assessed and equalized. The statement shall include the amount of any charges which may be added to the assessment pursuant to this division and a description of the property to which the charge applies as such property is described upon the county rolls.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1938.)
-------------------------------------------

26652.

The county auditor shall compute and enter in the assessment book the district assessment on all lands assessed as being in the district using the rates fixed by the district’s board of directors and the assessed value of the lands in the assessment book at the time and in the manner he computes and enters county taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1938.)
-------------------------------------------

26653.

The assessment so levied shall be collected at the time and in the manner of county taxes and paid into the county treasury. The net amount of the taxes, after the deduction of the county’s compensation for the services of its treasurer, assessor and tax collector shall be paid to the district by warrant of the county auditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1938.)
-------------------------------------------

26654.

The compensation paid to the county for assessing or collecting assessments for a district shall be that fixed by agreement between the board of supervisors and the district’s board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1938.)
-------------------------------------------

26655.

Unpaid district assessments are delinquent on the same hour and day that county taxes are delinquent and the lands subject thereto shall either be sold to the district or be declared tax-defaulted in the manner, at the time, and upon the penalties of default of property for nonpayment of county taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1420, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

26656.

Lands sold for delinquent district assessments may be redeemed within five years from date of sale in the same manner as the redemption of property after sale for nonpayment of county taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1346.)
-------------------------------------------

26657.

The county auditor shall apportion to the district the money paid for redemption in the manner provided by Division 1, Part 8, Chapter 1(c) of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1938.)
-------------------------------------------

26658.

Lands sold to the district remaining unredeemed after five years have elapsed from the date of their sale for delinquent district assessments shall be deeded to the district by the county tax collector. The deed shall be substantially in the form provided for collector’s deeds by Section 26276 of the Water Code and shall have the same effect and be recorded in the same manner as irrigation district’s collector’s deeds under the provisions of Articles 4 and 5 of Chapter 6 of this part. Land which has been declared to be tax-defaulted remaining unredeemed after five years have elapsed from the date of the tax-default for delinquent district assessments
 shall become subject to the tax collector’s power of sale pursuant to Section 3691 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1420, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Collection, Payment in Lieu of Assessment and Distribution of Water by Public Agencies [26670. - 26677.]

26670.

As used in this chapter, “public agency” means any city or district, other than an irrigation district, authorized to distribute water, which is in whole or in part included within the exterior boundaries of an irrigation district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 603.)
-------------------------------------------

26671.

Any district may enter into a contract with any public agency which provides in effect as follows:

1. The public agency shall:

a. Collect for the district assessments levied by the district against all or part of the lands within the district and shall collect such assessments and pay the amount thereof over to the district at such times and in the manner agreed upon between the district and the public agency; or, in the alternative,

b. Pay to the district in lieu of assessments by
 the district upon all or any part of the lands within the district a sum of money which shall not be less than the total amount of assessments which would have been levied by the district against those lands in the absence of such contract calculated upon the same basis as assessments made upon an acreage basis against other land in the district receiving gravity water service. Such payment shall be made at such time and in the manner agreed upon between the district and the public agency.

2. If the contract provides for the payment of a water charge in addition to the assessment upon district lands, then in determining the sum of money which may be paid to the district in lieu of assessments by the district under paragraph b of subdivision 1, the district may determine that a lesser rate of assessment or no assessment would be appropriate upon lands covered by the contract and, if such determination is made, may so provide in the contract and
 adjust or eliminate the assessment.

3. The district shall make available to the public agency each year for distribution and use upon the lands within the district covered by the contract, such a quantity of water as may be agreed upon by the district and the public agency.

4. The owner of lands within the district covered by such a contract shall each year be entitled to receive and use from the water so made available by the district to the public agency, or from other water available to the public agency, an amount of water sufficient to supply his reasonable and beneficial needs, limited however to his proportionate share of such water made available by the district based upon the ratio which the number of acres owned by him bears to the total number of acres within the district receiving a surface supply of water from the district and the public agency.

5. The public agency may charge such rates as it may determine for the service of water to any lands covered by the contract unless such rates are limited by agreement between the district and the public agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

26672.

The water made available by the district to the public agency may be used upon the lands covered by such contract for such irrigation, municipal, domestic or other uses as the district and the public agency may agree upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 603.)
-------------------------------------------

26673.

Upon the execution of such contract and so long as the contract remains in force and effect, the district shall be relieved of any further obligation to furnish water for use on the lands covered by the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 603.)
-------------------------------------------

26674.

Nothing in this chapter authorizes the sale or transfer of any water right nor shall the agreement authorized in Section 26671 be construed or deemed to constitute the sale or transfer of a water right.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 603.)
-------------------------------------------

26675.

No right in any water or water right owned by the district or the public agency shall be acquired or lost by the use permitted by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 603.)
-------------------------------------------

26676.

Except as otherwise provided herein the contract between the district and the public agency may include such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the district and the public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 603.)
-------------------------------------------

26677.

The provisions of this chapter shall supersede all provisions of this code inconsistent herewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 603.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11. CHANGES IN ORGANIZATION [26875. - 26875.]



  CHAPTER 2. Inclusion [26875. - 26875.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition and Notice [26875. - 26875.]

26875.

Land which is not a part of the district, whether or not contiguous to it, may be included within the district.

If such land is not capable of being served water at the time of inclusion, the board may exempt the included parcel from the imposition of district assessments, in whole or in part, until such time as a water supply is available for service to such land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 817.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 12. REPEALS [29975. - 29978.]

29975.

The following acts are hereby repealed: Yr. Ch.Pg. Yr.Ch. Pg.1854 : 57 : 761893:211 : 2951860 :220 : 1821897:189 : 2541863–4 : 89 : 871903: 5 : 31863–4 :174 : 1671907:298 : 5691865–6 :470 : 6091915: 1 : 11865–6 :556 : 7771917:160 : 2431867–8 :135 : 1121917:591 : 9051871–2 :634 : 9451919:356 : 7511873–4 :214 : 3121919:370 : 7781875–6 :110 : 791921:600 :10181875–6 :347 : 4861923:225 : 4491875–6 :396 : 5471927:748 :14151875–6 :491 : 7311929: 64 : 1361877–8 :300 : 3741931: 53 : 461877–8 :306 : 3871933: 75 : 5131877–8 :345 : 4681937: 24 : 921877–8 :526 : 8201941:466 :17651887 : 34 : 29

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

29976.

The following acts are hereby repealed:
 Yr. Ch. Pg. 
1917: 606: 936
1933: 994: 2557
1935: 833: 2250

Notwithstanding the repeal of said acts the provisions thereof as codified in this division shall continue to apply to the Palo Verde Irrigation District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

29978.

The repeals effected by this part shall not be construed to deprive any district or any person or other entity of any substantial right which would have existed or hereafter exist had such repeals not been effected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12. COUNTY WATER DISTRICTS [30000. - 33901.]



PART 1. INTRODUCTORY PROVISIONS [30000. - 30068.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title [30000. - 30000.]

30000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the County Water District Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [30010. - 30027.]

30010.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter shall govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30011.

The definition of a word applies to any of its variants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30012.

“Include” except when used in relation to the inclusion of land into a district does not necessarily exclude matters not enumerated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30013.

“District” means a county water district formed under the provisions of the County Water District Act or this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30014.

“Board” means the board of directors of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30015.

“Land” except in Chapter 2 of Part 8 means land in the district or proposed district involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30016.

“President” means the president of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30017.

“Secretary” means the secretary of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30018.

“Assessee” means the person to whom property is assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30019.

“General district election” means the election required to be held in each district on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each odd-numbered year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

30020.

“Special water district election” means any district election other than a general district election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

30021.

“Elector,” “voter,” and “precinct board” have respectively the same meaning as defined in the Elections Code, but an “elector” or “voter” shall also be a resident of the district or proposed district involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 233.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

30022.

“Holder of title” includes a holder of evidence of title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30023.

“Property” embraces all real and personal property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30024.

“Works” includes water works, conduits, reservoirs, storage sites, water sheds, machinery, wells, pumps, dams, storage tanks, tunnels, hydrants, meters, works and facilities for the collection, treatment and disposal of sewage, waste and storm waters, fire protection works and facilities, other appliances and their appurtenances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1295.)
-------------------------------------------

30025.

“Conduit” includes canals, channels, pipes, ditches, and flumes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30026.

“Operate” includes use, maintain, and repair.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30027.

“Street” includes road, alley, avenue, highway, and public way.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. General Provisions [30060. - 30068.]

30060.

Nothing in this division shall be so construed as repealing or in anywise modifying any other law relating to water or the supply of water to or the acquisition thereof by counties or municipalities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30062.

All land which is now privately owned and situate within the exterior boundaries of any district, but which was public land of the United States or of this State at the time of the formation of the district and has not heretofore been added to the district is hereby added to the district. The Legislature hereby finds and determines that all of the land is and will be benefited by the formation, existence and operation of the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

30063.

Whenever by this division a notice is required to be published for a designated number of weeks or once a week for a designated number of weeks, the notice need be published on only one day of each week and for only the same number of times as the number of weeks designated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

30064.

Wherever in this division a reference is made to the county in which a district is situated or to any of the officers thereof, such reference, with respect to a district located in more than one county, shall be deemed to be to the county in which the greater portion of the district is located or to the officers of such county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

30065.

The inclusion in, or annexation or addition to, a county water district, of all or any part of the corporate area of any public corporation or public agency, shall not destroy the identity or legal existence or impair the powers of any such public corporation or public agency, notwithstanding the identity of purpose, or substantial identity of purpose, of such county water district.

No public corporation or public agency having identity of purpose or substantial identity of purpose shall be formed partly or entirely within a county water district existing under the provisions of this code without the consent of such county water district. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any city from annexing territory within a county water district without the consent of such county water district.

All county water districts heretofore formed partly or entirely within another county water district previously existing under the provisions of this code, with or without the consent of such previously existing county water district and for a purpose not then actually exercised, or to provide a service not then provided by said previously existing county water district, are hereby declared to be valid and legally existing districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 934.)
-------------------------------------------

30066.

An action to determine the validity of an assessment, or of warrants, contracts, obligations, or evidences of indebtedness pursuant to this division may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

30068.

Districts governed by this division are subject to the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. FORMATION [30200. - 30325.]



  CHAPTER 1. Petition for Formation [30200. - 30205.]

30200.

The people of a county or two or more contiguous counties or of a portion of such county or counties, whether the portion includes unincorporated territory or not, may form a county water district pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

30201.

The petition for formation shall describe the proposed boundaries of the proposed district and shall pray that it be incorporated into a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30202.

The petition shall be signed by voters equal in number to at least 10 percent of the voters registered within the boundaries of the proposed district 30 days prior to the date the petition is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1233.)
-------------------------------------------

30203.

But, if one or more municipal corporations or part thereof is included in the proposed district, the petition shall be signed by at least 10 percent of the voters of each municipal corporation or part thereof and of the unincorporated territory included in the proposed district voting at the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30204.

The petition may consist of any number of separate instruments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30205.

The petition for the formation of a county water district to include all or part of Pleasant Valley, Ventura County, may be signed by either:

(a) The number of voters required by Section 30202, or

(b) Ten percent of the owners of land within the proposed district.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to the formation of a county water district in all or part of Pleasant Valley, Ventura County.

The special provisions are necessary because in the Pleasant Valley area in Ventura County much of the land is owned by persons living in the near-by communities of Oxnard, Ventura, Camarillo, and other near-by towns and many of the persons residing on the land are not the owners of the land and the owners wish to form a county water district. The owners will be the ones primarily concerned with such a district and the ones who will be supporting such a district and not the resident nonowners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1287.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Notice of Hearing on Formation [30230. - 30232.]

30230.

The county elections official of the county containing the proposed district shall publish a notice of a hearing on the formation petition once a week for at least two weeks before the time when the petition is to be presented and considered in at least one, but not to exceed three, newspapers printed and published in the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 158.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30231.

The notice of the hearing on the formation petition shall contain all of the following:

(a) The text of the petition, which need be set forth only once even though contained upon more than one instrument.

(b) The number of signers of the petition.

(c) At least five of the names attached to the petition.

(d) The time of the meeting of the board of supervisors at which the petition will be presented and considered.

(e) A statement that all persons interested may then appear and be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30232.

No defect in the contents of the petition, the title to or form of the notice, signatures, or lack of signatures thereto shall vitiate the proceedings if the petition has a sufficient number of qualified signatures attached thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Hearing on Formation [30260. - 30265.]

30260.

The formation petition shall be presented and considered at a regular meeting of the board of supervisors of the county in which the proposed district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30261.

At the time stated in the notice of the hearing on the formation petition for its consideration the board of supervisors shall hear the petition and those appearing thereon together with any written protests filed with the clerk of the board prior to the hearing by or on behalf of owners of taxable property situated within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30262.

The board of supervisors may adjourn the hearing from time to time, not exceeding four weeks in all.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30263.

Upon the hearing of the petition the board of supervisors shall determine whether or not the petition complies with this part and for that purpose shall hear all competent and relevant testimony offered in support of or in opposition thereto. The determination shall be entered upon the minutes of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30264.

On the final hearing the board of supervisors shall make changes in the proposed boundaries of the proposed district as may be deemed advisable and shall describe the boundaries of the proposed district. In doing this:

(a) No land included in the proposed district in the petition which will be benefited by the proposed district shall be excluded.

(b) No land which will not in the judgment of the board be benefited by the district shall be included.

(c) Upon the application of any person whose land was not included in the petition but whose land will be benefited by the proposed district, the land may in the discretion of the board be included.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30264.1.

If the board of supervisors at its final hearing determines and finds, for good cause on reasons specified in writing, from the evidence taken at the hearing that the proposed district as its boundaries are described in the petition or as changed by the board is not in the public interest, it may dismiss the petition and terminate the proceedings, but if the board determines and finds that the proposed district is in the public interest it shall call an election to be held in the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether or not the district shall be organized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1343.)
-------------------------------------------

30265.

A finding of the board of supervisors in favor of the genuineness and sufficiency of the petition and notice shall be conclusive against all persons except the State upon suit by the Attorney General commenced within one year after the order of the board of supervisors declaring the district formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Election on Formation [30290. - 30297.]

30290.

If it determines that an election should be held, the board of supervisors shall call and give notice of the election to be held in the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether or not it shall be formed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1343.)
-------------------------------------------

30291.

The election shall be held on the next established election date not less than 74 days from the date of the final hearing on the formation petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

30292.

The notice of the formation election shall contain:

(a) The date of the election.

(b) A description of the boundaries of the proposed district.

(c) The name of the proposed district, which name shall contain the words “County Water District.”

(d) A statement that the first directors will be elected at that election, who will take office if the district is formed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

30293.

The county clerk shall publish the notice once a week for at least two weeks prior to the formation election in at least one, but not to exceed three, newspapers printed and published in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30293.1.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer, within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed. 

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

30293.2.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

30293.3.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

30293.4.

The officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following in the order prescribed:

(a) The complete text of the proposition.

(b) The impartial analysis of the proposition prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(c) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(d) The argument against the proposed district formation.

The elections officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 234.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

30294.

At the formation election:

(a) The measure “Shall the proposition to form _______ County Water District under the County Water District Law be adopted?” shall be submitted.

(b) The first directors for the proposed district shall be elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

30295.

The election thereupon shall be conducted, the vote canvassed, and the result declared in the same manner as provided by law in respect to general water district elections so far as applicable except as in this chapter otherwise provided and except that directors shall be nominated and voted for as nearly as may be as provided in Part 4 of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

30296.

The vote shall be canvassed by the board of supervisors at the next regular meeting which is five or more days after the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

30297.

In case less than a majority of the votes cast in each municipal corporation or part thereof or in the unincorporated territory included in the proposed district are in favor of the measure, the formation fails but without prejudice to renewing proceedings at any time in the future.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Establishment of District [30320. - 30325.]

30320.

If a majority of the votes cast at the election in each municipal corporation or part thereof and in the unincorporated territory included in the proposed district is in favor of forming the district, the board of supervisors shall by an order entered on its minutes declare the territory formed as a district under the name designated for it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30321.

The county clerk shall immediately cause to be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the district is situated a certificate stating that the formation of the district was approved by the voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

30321.5.

The county clerk shall immediately cause to be filed with the county assessor and the State Board of Equalization a certificate listing all of the following:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of the order declaring the district formed.
